Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6103.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General
Laws, section 52 of chapter 206 of the acts of 2024 or any other general or special law to the
contrary, the division of capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the
department of conversation and recreation, may lease to the city of Medford for a term of up to
30 years, including any extensions, the parcel of land described in section 2 and the ice skating
rink thereon to the city of Medford for recreational purposes.
of 2

SECTION 2. The parcel of land with the LoConte Memorial Rink to be leased pursuant
to section 1 is located at 97 Locust Street in the city of Medford and contains 1.44 acres, more or
less.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the lease shall:
(i) be on such terms and conditions as the commissioner of the division of capital asset
management and maintenance, in consultation with the department of conservation and
recreation, deems advisable; and (ii) provide for the city of Medford to operate, manage,
maintain and repair the property, which costs shall be taken into account as part of the
consideration of the lease.
SECTION 4. If the property ceases to be used for said purposes, except for period of
repair or rehabilitation, the commissioner of the division of capital asset management and
maintenance shall terminate the lease and the property shall revert to the commonwealth under
the care and control of the department of conservation and recreation.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the city of
Medford shall be responsible for half of the costs and expenses of the lease of the parcel of land
described in section 2 as determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance, which may include, but not limited to, the costs of any engineering, surveys and
recording fees related to the lease of said parcel to the city of Medford.
of 2